trunk/apertium-en-ca/apertium-en-ca.en.metadix
    <pardef n="/be__vblex">
      <e c="CP: verb 'ser' per a multiparaules ('be missing', etc.)">
        <p>
          <l>be</l>
          <r>be<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>are</l>
          <r>be<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>be<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>be<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>was</l>
          <r>be<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>was</l>
          <r>be<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>were</l>
          <r>be<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>been</l>
          <r>be<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>being</l>
          <r>be<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>being</l>
          <r>be<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>being</l>
          <r>be<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

                                     
<pardef n="contraction_be__vblex">
  <e><p><l>'m</l><r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>'re</l><r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>'s</l><r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


    <pardef n="ha/ve__vblex">
      <e c="CP: verb to have paradigme">
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ving</l>
          <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/o__vblex">
      <e c="CP: verb to do paradigme">
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oes</l>
          <r>o<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>o<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>one</l>
          <r>o<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oing</l>
          <r>o<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oing</l>
          <r>o<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oing</l>
          <r>o<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="accept__vblex">
      <e c="CP: regular verbs (-,s,ing,ed)">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="liv/e__vblex">
      <e c="CP: regular verbs ending in -e (e,es,ing,ed)">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="appl/y__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ied</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ied</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="enjoy__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="be worthwhile"><i></i><par n="/be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>worthwhile</l><r><g><b/>worthwhile</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="be left">      <i/>      <par n="/be__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>left</l><r><g><b/>left</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="be a member of" r="RL">      <i/>      <par n="/be__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>a<b/>member<b/>of</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>member<b/>of</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bake"><i>bak</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="bank"><i>bank</i><par n="accept__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="bury"><i>bur</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="cheer"><i>cheer</i><par n="accept__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="communicate"><i>communicat</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="convey"><i>convey</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="do"><i>d</i><par n="d/o__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="defy"><i>def</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="delay"><i>delay</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="delete"><i>delet</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="depend"><i>depend</i><par n="accept__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="destroy"><i>destroy</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="display"><i>display</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="enforce"><i>enforc</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="explain"><i>explain</i><par n="accept__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="fortify"><i>fortif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="have got"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>got</l><r><g><b/>got</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="have a feeling that"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>a<b/>feeling<b/>that</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>feeling<b/>that</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="have"><i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="marry"><i>marr</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="moderate"><i>moderat</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="mount"><i>mount</i><par n="accept__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="obey"><i>obey</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="pity"><i>pit</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="shell"><i>shell</i><par n="accept__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="serve"><i>serv</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="supply"><i>suppl</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="undo"><i>und</i><par n="d/o__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="annoy" a="ebenimeli"><i>annoy</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="be dying"><par n="/be__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>dying</l><r><g><b/>dying</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="be used to"><par n="/be__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>used<b/>to</l><r><g><b/>used<b/>to</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="be afraid of" r="LR"><i></i><par n="/be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>afraid<b/>of</l><r><g><b/>afraid<b/>of</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="load"><i>load</i><par n="accept__vblex"/>     </e>
<e lm="be very sorry"><i/><par n="/be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>very<b/>sorry</l><r><g><b/>very<b/>sorry</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="portray"><i>portray</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>     </e>
    <e lm="redo"><i>red</i><par n="d/o__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="settle down"><i>settl</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p>    </e>
    <e lm="exemplify"><i>exemplif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex" /></e>
     <e lm="group" a="eleka"><i>group</i><par n="accept__vblex"/>    </e>
<e lm="be unlikely" r="LR"><par n="contraction_be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>unlikely</l><r><g><b/>unlikely</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="be sorry" r="LR"><par n="contraction_be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>sorry</l><r><g><b/>sorry</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="be left" r="LR"><par n="contraction_be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>left</l><r><g><b/>left</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="be missing" r="LR"><par n="contraction_be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>missing</l><r><g><b/>missing</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="be born" r="LR"><par n="contraction_be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>born</l><r><g><b/>born</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="be worth" r="LR"><par n="contraction_be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>worth</l><r><g><b/>worth</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="be hungry" r="LR"><par n="contraction_be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>hungry</l><r><g><b/>hungry</g></r></p></e>
